Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.060

Survey map, field notes and profiles.

The county road engineer shall file with his or her report a correctly prepared map of the road as surveyed, which map must show the tracts of land over which the road passes, with the names, if known, of the several owners thereof, and he or she shall file therewith his or her field notes and profiles of such survey.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4137; 1963 c 4 s 36.81.060. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 21, part; RRS s 6450-21, part.]